District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1102.10

Identification of campaign literature.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 454, Pub. L. 93-376, title II, § 210
June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 3(d), 25 DCR 9454
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(s), 29 DCR 458
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1420.
1973 Ed., § 1-1140.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).